Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 6 State Police Retirement
24-6-201. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Accumulated contributions” means the sum of all amounts deducted from the salaries of a member and credited to his or her individual account in the members' deposit account, together with regular interest credited thereon;

“Beneficiary” means any person, except a retirant, who is in receipt of, or who is entitled to receive, a pension or other benefit payable from funds of the State Police Retirement System;

“Board” means the Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System;

“Contributory member” means a state police officer who was a member of the system prior to January 1, 1978, and who continues to contribute six percent (6%) of his or her compensation to the system;

“Credited service” means the service credited a member by the board to the extent provided in this subchapter;

[Repealed.]

[Repealed.]

“Final average compensation” for contributory service means the average of the annual salaries paid a member for the three (3) years of credited service rendered by the member immediately preceding his or her last termination of employment with the Division of Arkansas State Police, but the final average compensation shall not exceed that of the highest permanent rank.

“Final average compensation” for Tier I noncontributory service means the average of the highest annual compensation paid a member during any period of sixty (60) calendar months of credited service with the division.

Should a member have less than sixty (60) calendar months of credited service, “final average compensation” means the monthly average paid to the member during his or her total years of credited service;

“Member” means any state police officer who is included in the membership of the system;

“Noncontributory member” means a state police officer who does not contribute a portion of his or her compensation to the system;

“Pension” means an annual amount payable from funds of the system throughout the life of a person.

All pensions shall be paid in equal monthly installments;

“Pension reserve” means the present value of a pension computed upon the basis of such mortality and other tables of experience, and regular interest, as the board, from time to time, may adopt;

“Public safety member” means a state police officer in the State Police Retirement System who is a Tier I noncontributory member.

Employment as a public safety member shall be credited at one and one-half (1½) times the regular rate for crediting service;

“Regular interest” means such rates of interest per annum, compounded annually, as the board, from time to time, shall prescribe;

“Retirant” means any member who retires with a pension payable from funds of the system;

“Retirement” means a member's withdrawal from the employ of the division with a pension payable from funds of the system;

“Salary” means the compensation paid a member for service rendered as a state police officer.

In no case shall the term “salary” include reimbursement for lodging, meals, or travel expenses;

“Service” means service rendered to the division by a state police officer and shall include previous service, if any, rendered as an Arkansas state ranger, state police officer with the Department of Arkansas State Police, or state police officer with the division;

“State police officer” means any employee of the division or its predecessor entities who holds the rank of state trooper or higher rank, and it shall include the Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police.

The term “state police officer” shall not include any civilian employee of the division, nor shall it include any person who is temporarily employed as a state trooper for an emergency.

In any case of doubt as to who is a “state police officer”, the board shall decide the question;

“System” means the State Police Retirement System;

“Tier I” refers to covered employment for those first hired on or before April 2, 1997, as provided for in this subchapter; and

“Tier II” refers to covered employment for those first hired on or after April 3, 1997, as provided for in § 24-6-401 et seq.

History.

Acts 1951, No. 311, § 1; 1959, No. 484, § 1; 1973, No. 441, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-451; Acts 2001, No. 151, § 54; 2019, No. 910, §§ 6026-6029.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment repealed the defined terms “department” and “director”; substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “department” in (8)(A); substituted “division” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” in (8)(B)(i); substituted “division” for “department” in (16), (18), and (19)(B); added “state police officer with the Department of Arkansas State Police, or state police officer with the Division of Arkansas State Police” in (18); and in (19)(A), substituted “division or its predecessor entities” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” and “Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police” for “director”.

24-6-202. Penalty.

Any person who knowingly makes any false statements or who falsifies or permits to be falsified any records of the State Police Retirement System or the Department of Arkansas State Police in an attempt to defraud the system as the result of that act shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Upon conviction by a court, that person shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

History.

Acts 1951, No. 311, § 8; 1959, No. 484, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-458; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 364.

24-6-203. Creation.

The State Police Retirement System is created and established in conformance with this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1951, No. 311, § 1; 1959, No. 484, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-451.

24-6-204. Board of trustees.

The Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System is created.

The board shall consist of seven (7) trustees, as follows:

One (1) active member enrolled in the Tier I benefits program;

One (1) active vested member enrolled in the Tier II benefits program;

One (1) state police commissioner who shall be appointed by the Governor;

The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State or his or her designee; and

Three (3) citizens at large who shall be appointed by the Governor.

The citizens at large shall have no interest, direct or indirect, in the Division of Arkansas State Police.

The elections of member trustees shall be held under rules as the board shall from time to time adopt to govern the elections.

The regular term of office of a member trustee shall be seven (7) years.

The elections of the board's officer members shall be held under rules as the board shall from time to time adopt to govern elections.

At the board's first regular meeting following July 1, 2009, the members who are on the board shall draw lots to determine the length of terms.

The terms shall be staggered in the following manner:

One (1) member's term shall expire July 1, 2010;

One (1) member's term shall expire July 1, 2011;

One (1) member's term shall expire July 1, 2012;

One (1) member's term shall expire July 1, 2013;

One (1) member's term shall expire July 1, 2014;

One (1) member's term shall expire July 1, 2015; and

One (1) member's term shall expire July 1, 2016.

In the event any trustee provided for in subsection (a) of this section:

Ceases to be a state police officer; or

Fails to attend scheduled meetings of the board for three (3) consecutive meetings unless, in each case, he or she or she is excused by the remaining trustees attending the meetings,

If a vacancy occurs in the office of trustee, the vacancy shall be filled for the unexpired term in the same manner as the office was previously filled.

The administration, management, and control of the State Police Retirement System shall be vested in the board.

The executive director and administrative staff of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System shall be the executive secretary and the administrative staff of the State Police Retirement System.

All administrative records of the State Police Retirement System shall be maintained within the administrative offices of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System.

The executive secretary shall be the disbursing agent of all appropriations made by the General Assembly out of the State Police Retirement Fund.

The executive secretary shall furnish and file with the Auditor of State a bond with a corporate guaranty or indemnity surety thereon in the penal sum of two thousand dollars ($2,000), the premium on which shall be paid from appropriations made available to the division.

The Attorney General shall serve as legal advisor to the board.

The board shall hold meetings regularly, at least one (1) in each quarter year, and shall designate the time and place of the meetings.

Special meetings may be held in accordance with rules as the board shall adopt.

Four (4) board members, including one (1) officer member, shall constitute a quorum at any meeting of the board, and at least four (4) concurring votes shall be necessary for a decision by the board at any of its meetings.

The board shall adopt its own rules or procedures and shall keep a record of its proceedings, which shall be open to public inspection.

In addition to other duties that are imposed upon the board by this subchapter, the board shall:

Make all rules from time to time as it shall deem necessary in the transaction of its business and in administering the State Police Retirement System;

Provide for the administrative direction and control of the Executive Secretary in the performance of his or her duties as Executive Secretary of the State Police Retirement System;

Provide for an actuarial valuation of the assets and liabilities of the State Police Retirement System or the retirement reserve account at least one (1) time in each four-year period from and after December 31, 1958;

Adopt mortality and other tables of experience and rates of regular interest that are required for the proper operation of the State Police Retirement System;

Perform the duties of trustee without additional compensation. However, trustees may receive expense reimbursement in accordance with § 25-16-901 et seq.; and

Do all things necessary for the proper administration of the State Police Retirement System and for carrying out and making effective the provisions of this subchapter.

However, no recommendations for benefit enhancements shall be made that would cause the actuarially accrued unfunded liabilities of the State Police Retirement System to exceed thirty (30) years.

the board by resolution shall declare his or her office of trustee vacated as of the date of adoption of the resolution.

History.

Acts 1951, No. 311, §§ 2, 9; 1959, No. 484, § 2; 1969, No. 647, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 42-452, 42-452.1, 42-459; Acts 1989, No. 23, § 1; 1989, No. 529, § 4[5]; 1997, No. 250, § 230; 2005, No. 68, § 1; 2007, No. 404, § 1; 2009, No. 1242, § 3; 2019, No. 315, § 2871.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

The operation of subdivision (c)(3) of this section was suspended by adoption of a self-insured fidelity bond program for public officers, officials and employees, effective July 20, 1987, pursuant to § 21-2-701 et seq. The subdivision may again become effective upon cessation of coverage under that program. See § 21-2-703.

Subsection (a) of this section was amended by Acts 1989, Nos. 23 and 529. Acts 1989, No. 529 has been codified as it was deemed to include the amendments made by Acts 1989, No. 23.

Acts 2009, No. 1242, §
1, provided: “Legislative history, findings, and intent.

“(a) It is found and determined by the General Assembly that the Department of Arkansas State Police has had ongoing financial difficulty for over twelve (12) years. The State Police Retirement System has sustained investment losses of approximately one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) within the last two (2) years, and so needs a larger investment pool to help reduce risk and enhance returns. The Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System has the size and expertise to effectively reduce the volatility of returns, enhance relative returns, and best protect the State Police Retirement System.

“(b) This act represents a negotiated alternative to a proposal that would have eliminated the State Police Retirement System and would have made it a division of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System.

“(c) This act maintains the autonomy over State Police Retirement System benefits but ensures funds are invested in a larger, more diversified pool of assets.

“(d) It is contemplated that at such time as the State Police Retirement System attains a funding level in which assets are eighty percent (80%) or more of actuarially accrued liabilities, the Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System may consider certain enhancements to the Tier II Deferred Retirement Option Plan.”

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1969, No. 647, § 2, provided that the Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System would continue to exercise the powers, functions, and duties which it had theretofore exercised and that nothing in subdivision (c)(2) of this section would be construed to diminish or otherwise alter the powers, functions, and duties of the board.

The terms of the three member trustees of the Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System are arranged so that one term expires on the fourteenth day of January of every year.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment rewrote (a)(2); substituted “subsection (a)” for “subdivisions (a)(2)(A)(iv) and (v)” in (b)(1); deleted (d) and (e) and redesignated the subsequent subsections accordingly; in (e)(1), substituted “Four (4) board members, including one (1) officer member” for “Five (5) voting trustees” and substituted “at least four (4)” for “at least five (5)”; deleted (f)(5), inserted present (f)(6)(B), and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (f)(1).

24-6-205. Correction of errors.

Should any change or error in the records of the State Police Retirement System or the Department of Arkansas State Police result in any person's receiving from the system more or less than he or she would have been entitled to receive had the records been correct, the Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System shall correct the error and, as far as is practicable, shall adjust the payment in such manner that the actuarial equivalent of the benefit to which the person was correctly entitled shall be paid.

The board shall have the right to recover any overpayment any person may have received from funds of the system.

History.

Acts 1951, No. 311, § 8; 1959, No. 484, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-458.

24-6-206. State Police Retirement Fund — Accounts.

There is established on the books of the Treasurer of State, Auditor of State, and Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be known as the “State Police Retirement Fund”, which shall consist of the trust funds designated by law.

This fund shall be used for payment of personal services, operating expenses, investments, benefits, refunds, and for such other purposes as may be authorized by law.

The accounts of the State Police Retirement System shall be the members' deposit account, employer accumulation account, retirement reserve account, and income account, as follows:

Members' Deposit Account.

The members' deposit account shall be the account in which members' contributions shall be accumulated at regular interest and from which shall be made transfers and refunds of contributions or accumulated contributions, as provided in this subchapter.

Upon the retirement of a member, his or her accumulated contributions standing to his or her credit in the members' deposit account shall be transferred to the retirement reserve account;

Employer Accumulation Account.

The employer accumulation account shall be the account in which shall be accumulated the contributions made by the State of Arkansas to the system.

Upon the retirement of a member, the difference between his or her pension reserve and his or her accumulated contributions standing to his or her credit in the members' deposit account shall be transferred from the employer accumulation account to the retirement reserve account.

If, at the end of any fiscal year, the sum of the balances in the employer accumulation account and the retirement reserve account is insufficient to equal an amount of ten (10) times the total of the pensions paid from the retirement reserve account during that fiscal year, the Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System shall certify to the Treasurer of State that a deficiency exists in the State Police Retirement Fund.

Upon receipt of that certification, the Treasurer of State shall transfer from the Division of Arkansas State Police Fund to the State Police Retirement Fund an amount equal to ten percent (10%) of the deficiency so certified. When transferred, the amount shall be credited to the employer accumulation account.

All amounts credited to the State Police Retirement Fund in accordance with § 16-92-110 [repealed] shall be credited to the employer accumulation account;

Retirement Reserve Account.

The retirement reserve account shall be the account from which all pensions provided for in this subchapter shall be paid.

If a disability retirant returns to the employ of the Division of Arkansas State Police, his or her pension reserve at that time shall be transferred from the retirement reserve account to the members' deposit account and the employer accumulation account in the same proportion as the pension reserve was originally transferred to the retirement reserve account; and

Income Account.

The income account shall be the account to which shall be credited all interest, dividends, and other income derived from investments of the system, all gifts and bequests received by the system, and all other moneys, the disposition of which is not specifically provided for in this subchapter.

There shall be paid or transferred from the income account all amounts required to credit regular interest to the various accounts of the system except the income account.

Whenever the board determines that the balance in the income account is more than sufficient to cover current charges to the account, the excess may be transferred by the board to any of the other accounts of the system to cover special needs of the accounts.

A decision on whether to invest, not invest, or withdraw from investment the funds of the system shall not be based on a consideration that the location of the investment, fund, company, or any other type of investment vehicle is in the State of Israel.

History.

Acts 1951, No. 311, § 3; 1959, No. 484, § 3; 1981, No. 855, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-453; Acts 2017, No. 768, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

The State Police Retirement Fund is also created at§ 19-5-917.

Publisher's Notes.

Former § 16-92-110 was repealed by Acts 1995, No. 1256, § 20, as amended by Acts 1995 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 13, § 4.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment added (c).

24-6-207. Membership.

The Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police and all other state police officers shall become members of the State Police Retirement System.

All persons who became, or become, state police officers after March 19, 1951, shall become members of the system.

None of the other employees of the Division of Arkansas State Police shall be eligible to membership in the system, and the conferring of rank upon any such employee shall not, in itself, constitute eligibility to membership in the system.

Any state police officer, upon appointment as Secretary of the Department of Public Safety, shall be eligible to continue his or her membership in the State Police Retirement System.

History.

Acts 1951, No. 311, § 5; 1953, No. 309, § 1; 1957, No. 308, § 1; 1959, No. 484, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-455; Acts 2019, No. 910, §§ 6030-6032.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” in (a) and (c); deleted “who were state police officers March 19, 1951, and who continued as state police officers on or after March 19, 1951” following “officers” in (a); and added (d).

24-6-208. Members' contributions.

The contributions of a contributory member to the State Police Retirement System covered by the contributory provisions shall be nine and one-fourth percent (9.25%) of the member's salary.

However, no member may be required to pay more than nine and one-fourth percent (9.25%) of the salary of the highest permanent rank in the Department of Arkansas State Police.

The officers responsible for making up the payroll shall cause the contributions provided for in this section to be deducted from the salaries of each member on each and every payroll, for each and every payroll period, from the date of his or her entrance into the system to the date his or her membership terminates.

When deducted, each of the amounts shall be paid into the State Police Retirement Fund and shall be credited to each member's individual account in the members' deposit account.

The contributions provided for in this section shall be made notwithstanding that the minimum salary provided by law for any member shall be thereby changed.

Each member shall be deemed to consent and agree to the deductions made and provided for in this section.

Payment of his or her salary less the deductions shall be a full and complete discharge and acquittance of all claims and demands whatsoever for services rendered to the department by the member, except as to benefits provided by this subchapter.

It is expressly guaranteed that all members' contributions shall be held in trust for the exclusive benefit of the individual members and that no part of the funds shall be used for any other purpose.

History.

Acts 1951, No. 311, § 3; 1959, No. 484, § 3; 1969, No. 646, § 1; 1973, No. 441, §§ 2, 3; 1974 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 93, § 8; 1977, No. 460, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 42-453, 42-453.1; Acts 2001, No. 151, § 55.

24-6-209. Employer's contribution.

The Division of Arkansas State Police, as employer, shall make contributions to the State Police Retirement System of twenty-two percent (22%) of active member payroll.

At the request of the Executive Secretary of the State Police Retirement System, the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration shall make annual transfers on each June 30 to the system from the remainder of insurance premium taxes enumerated in § 19-6-301(27) before those taxes are transferred to general revenues enumerated in § 19-6-201(19) the amounts of money necessary to amortize the unfunded liabilities over a period not to exceed thirty (30) years.

These transfers are intended to cover the unfunded accrued actuarial liabilities of the system and shall not be used for the purpose of providing any benefit enhancements for the system.

Members of the system shall not be entitled to any benefit enhancements from these transfers unless funds from sources other than insurance premium taxes are found to provide for the retirement benefit enhancements.

The amount of the transfer shall be determined by computing the dollar amount required based on the actuarially determined employer rate in the most recent annual actuarial valuation and subtracting from that amount the statutory contribution amount specified in subsection (a) of this section and the driver's license reinstatement fees provided by § 27-16-808.

These transfers shall be limited in use solely for the purpose of paying the unfunded accrued actuarial liabilities.

If the transfers under this section exceed eight hundred thousand dollars ($800,000) per fiscal year, the executive secretary shall notify the Joint Interim Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs, which shall then review the use of the funds and the benefit provisions of the system and the actuarial reports on the system to ensure compliance with the intended purpose of the funds.

History.

Acts 1951, No. 311, § 3; 1959, No. 484, § 3; 1969, No. 646, § 1; 1973, No. 441, § 2; 1974 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 93, § 8; 1977, No. 460, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 42-453, 42-453.1; Acts 1997, No. 1071, § 3; 2001, No. 151, § 56; 2005, No. 1023, § 1; 2007, No. 404, § 2; 2009, No. 654, § 1; 2019, No. 910, §§ 3555, 3556.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment, in (b)(6), substituted “system” for “systems” following “provisions of the,” and for “retirement systems” following “reports on,” and made minor stylistic and punctuation changes.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” in (a); and substituted “Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in (b)(1).

24-6-210. Credited service.

Any member who shall become separated from the employ of the Division of Arkansas State Police by reason of service in the United States Armed Forces shall have the service, not to exceed a total of five (5) years, credited to him or her as division service, but only if he or she returns to the employ of the division within one hundred eighty (180) days from and after termination of the armed service required of him or her and if he or she returns to the members' deposit account the amount of his or her accumulated contributions withdrawn by him or her, together with regular interest from the date of withdrawal to the date of repayment.

In any case of doubt as to the period to be so credited any member, the Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System shall have the final power to determine the period.

During the period of armed service and until his or her return to the employ of the division, his or her contributions to the members' deposit account shall be suspended, and his or her balance in the account shall be accumulated at regular interest.

The federal service so credited a member shall be excluded in computing his or her final average compensation.

The board shall determine by appropriate rules the amount of service to be credited any member.

In no case shall less than fifteen (15) days of service rendered in any calendar month be credited as a month of service, nor shall less than ten (10) months of service rendered in any calendar year be credited as a year of service, nor shall more than one (1) year of service be credited any member for all service rendered by him or her in any calendar year.

Except as otherwise provided in this subchapter, should any member leave the employ of the division for any reason except his or her retirement as provided in this subchapter or his or her death, he or she shall thereupon cease to be a member, and his or her credited service at that time shall be forfeited by him or her.

In the event he or she again becomes employed in the division as a state police officer, he or she shall again become a member of the system.

In the event his or her reemployment occurs within a period of five (5) years from and after the date he or she last left the employ of the division, his or her credited service last forfeited by him or her shall be restored to his or her credit, but only if he or she returns to the members' deposit account the amounts he or she may have withdrawn therefrom, together with regular interest from the date of withdrawal to the date of repayment.

Repayment shall be made according to such rules as the board shall adopt from time to time.

Except as otherwise provided in this subchapter, should a person return to the employment of the division after the expiration of a period of five (5) years from and after the date of his or her employment with the division last terminated, he or she shall not have his or her credited service last forfeited by him or her restored to his or her credit.

Upon a member's retirement or death, he or she shall cease to be a member.

History.

Acts 1951, No. 311, § 6; 1953, No. 309, § 2; 1957, No. 308, § 2; 1959, No. 484, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-456; Acts 2001, No. 151, § 57; 2019, No. 315, §§ 2872, 2873.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (b)(1) and (c)(3)(B).

24-6-211. Eligibility for benefits — Mandatory retirement.

A member shall be separated from Department of Arkansas State Police employment the first day of the calendar month next following the month in which he or she attains age sixty-five (65).

If, upon his or her separation from department employment, the member has five (5) or more years of actual service, he or she shall receive a pension provided for in § 24-6-214.

History.

Acts 1951, No. 311, § 5; 1953, No. 309, § 1; 1957, No. 308, § 1; 1971, No. 309, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-455; Acts 1997, No. 1053, § 18.

24-6-212. Eligibility for benefits — Voluntary retirement for contributory members.

Any contributory member who has acquired twenty (20) or more years of credited service or any contributory member who has attained age fifty (50) and has acquired five (5) or more years of actual service may voluntarily retire upon written application filed with the Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System.

This application shall set forth at what time, not less than thirty (30) days nor more than ninety (90) days subsequent to the execution and filing thereof, he or she desires to be retired.

Upon his or her retirement, he or she shall receive a pension provided for in § 24-6-214.

History.

Acts 1951, No. 311, § 5; 1953, No. 309, § 1; 1957, No. 308, § 1; 1959, No. 484, § 5; 1971, No. 309, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-455; Acts 1997, No. 1053, § 19; 2001, No. 151, § 58.

24-6-213. Eligibility for benefits — Disability retirement.

Upon application filed with the Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System by a member or by the Director of the Department of Arkansas State Police on behalf of a member, a member who is in the employ of the Department of Arkansas State Police, who has five (5) or more years of actual service, and who becomes totally and permanently incapacitated for duty in the employ of the department by reason of a personal injury or disease may be retired by the Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System, but only after a medical examination of the member.

The examination shall be made by or under the direction of a board of medical professionals as defined in the rules of the Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System, using the active duty criteria supplied by the Department of Arkansas State Police in determining the extent of the disability.

The five (5) years of service requirement contained in this subsection shall not apply to a member whom the Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System finds to be in receipt of workers' compensation for his or her disability arising solely and exclusively out of and in the course of his or her employment with the department.

Upon his or her retirement on account of disability as provided in subsection (a) of this section, a member shall receive a disability pension computed according to the contributory provisions of § 24-6-214 or the noncontributory provisions of § 24-6-227, as applicable.

However, a member's disability pension shall not be less than twenty percent (20%) of his or her final average compensation and shall be subject to subsections (c)-(e) of this section.

At least one (1) time each year during the first five (5) years following a member's retirement on account of disability and at least one (1) time in every three-year period thereafter, the Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System may and upon the retirant's application shall require any disability retirant who has not attained fifty (50) years of age to undergo a medical examination to be made by or under the direction of the medical professionals designated by the Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System.

If the retirant refuses to submit to a medical examination in any such period, his or her disability pension may be suspended by the Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System until his or her withdrawal of his or her refusal.

If his or her refusal continues for one (1) year, all his or her rights in and to a disability pension may be revoked by the Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System.

If upon the medical examination of the retirant the medical professionals designated by the Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System report to the Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System that the retirant is physically capable of performing the duties of the rank held by him or her at the time of his or her retirement, the retirant shall be returned to the employ of the department, and his or her disability pension shall be terminated.

Upon a disability retirant's return to the employ of the department as provided in subsection (c) of this section, his or her credited service at the time of his or her retirement shall be restored to his or her credit.

He or she shall be given service credit for the period he or she was receiving a disability pension if, within that period, he or she was in receipt of workers' compensation on account of his or her department employment.

In the event a disability retirant who has not attained age fifty (50) performs personal services in an occupation, business, or employment, his or her disability pension shall be reduced so that the sum of his or her disability pension and the compensation received by him or her from the occupation, business, or employment shall not exceed his or her annual rate of salary at the time of his or her retirement.

History.

Acts 1951, No. 311, § 5; 1953, No. 309, § 1; 1957, No. 308, § 1; 1959, No. 484, § 5; 1971, No. 309, §§ 4, 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-455; Acts 1997, No. 1053, § 20; 2001, No. 151, § 59; 2005, No. 69, § 1.

24-6-214. Benefits generally — Contributory member.

Upon his or her retirement as provided in this subchapter, a member shall receive a straight life pension equal to the following sum: Two and nine hundred forty-nine thousandths percent (2.949%) of his or her final average compensation multiplied by the number of years, and any fraction of a year, of his or her credited service not to exceed twenty (20) years, plus the sum of two and three hundred fifty-nine thousandths percent (2.359%) of his or her final average compensation multiplied by the number of years, and any fraction of a year, of his or her credited service in excess of twenty (20) years but not in excess of twenty-five (25) years, plus one and eighteen-hundredths percent (1.18%) of his or her final average compensation multiplied by the number of years, and any fraction of a year, of his or her credited service in excess of twenty-five (25) years but not in excess of thirty (30) years.

In the event a member who has acquired twenty (20) years or more of credited service retires prior to attainment of age fifty (50), as provided in this subchapter, his or her pension, as provided for in subsection (a) of this section, shall be reduced one-half percent (0.5%) multiplied by the number of completed months in the period from the date he or she requests his or her pension to begin to the date he or she would have attained age fifty (50).

In the event a member with five (5) years or more of credited service in the State Police Retirement System ceases to be employed as a state police officer prior to reaching fifty (50) years of age and does not withdraw his or her accumulated employee contributions to the system, the member shall be entitled to receive a pension upon reaching fifty (50) years of age, computed in the same manner as the pension of other retirants under the system.

Any member may elect to withdraw his or her accumulated contributions to the system at the time of terminating employment as a state police officer and to waive any pension rights the member may have earned in the system.

History.

Acts 1951, No. 311, § 5; 1953, No. 309, § 1; 1957, No. 308, § 1; 1971, No. 309, § 3; 1977, No. 460, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-455; Acts 1991, No. 225, § 1; 1997, No. 1053, § 21; 2001, No. 151, § 60.

24-6-215. Benefits — Death of retirant.

In the event a retirant who is in receipt of a straight life pension dies before he or she has received in straight life pension payments an aggregate amount equal to his or her accumulated contributions standing to his or her credit in the members' deposit account at the time of his or her retirement, then the difference between his or her accumulated contributions and the aggregate amount of straight life pension payments received by him shall be paid to such persons as he or she shall have nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System.

If there is no designated person surviving the retirant, the difference, if any, shall be paid in accordance with the laws of descent and distribution of the State of Arkansas.

The payments may be made directly to a curator, guardian, administrator, or executor authorized to receive such payments, wherever the representative may be, with or without the appointment of a representative in this state.

In no case shall any benefits be paid under this section on account of the death of a retirant if any pensions become payable from funds of the State Police Retirement System on account of his or her death.

History.

Acts 1951, No. 311, § 5; 1953, No. 309, § 1; 1957, No. 308, § 1; 1959, No. 484, § 5; 1971, No. 130, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-455.